Utah statutes.
72-2-121.1.   Highway Projects Within Counties Fund -- Accounting for
revenues -- Interest -- Expenditure of revenues.
(1)  There is created a special revenue fund within the Transportation Fund
known as the "Highway Projects Within Counties Fund."
(2)  The Highway Projects Within Counties Fund shall be funded by revenues
generated by a tax imposed by a county under Section 59-12-2216, if those
revenues are allocated:
(a)  for a purpose described in Subsection 59-12-2216(2)(c); and
(b)  in accordance with Section 59-12-2216.
(3)  The department shall make a separate accounting for:
(a)  the revenues described in Subsection (2); and
(b)  each county for which revenues are deposited into the Highway Projects
Within Counties Fund.
(4) (a)  The Highway Projects Within Counties Fund shall earn interest.
(b)  The department shall allocate the interest earned on the Highway Projects
Within Counties Fund:
(i)  proportionately;
(ii)  to each county's balance in the Highway Projects Within Counties Fund;
and
(iii)  on the basis of each county's balance in the Highway Projects Within
Counties Fund.
(5)  The department shall expend the revenues and interest deposited into the
Highway Projects Within Counties Fund to pay:
(a)  for a state highway project within the county:
(i)  described in Subsection 59-12-2216(2)(c)(i); and
(ii)  for which the requirements of Subsection 59-12-2216(6) are met;
(b)  debt service on a project described in Subsection (5)(a); or
(c)  bond issuance costs related to a project described in Subsection (5)(a).
